Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 186A Automated Motor Vehicle Registration System
186A.125.
Application for title or registration — Department to provide forms — County clerk to process documents. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

Application for a first certificate of registration, or title, in the name of an owner shall be made on forms prescribed by the Department of Vehicle Regulation consistent with this chapter, which shall be available from any county clerk.

Application forms shall be completed, except as to required signatures, by legibly printing in ink, or typing all required information.

The application, when presented to the county clerk, shall contain all required information and be fully executed with all required supporting documentation and fees.

The county clerk shall reject any application upon which the information provided is not legibly printed or typed, the required information is not supplied, not accompanied by required supporting documents, not properly executed with signatures when required, or when the clerk determines that the application is improper or that the applicant is not entitled to registration or title of the vehicle for which registration or title is sought, or in the absence of the required fees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 22, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 128, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

186A.125.
Application for title or registration — Department to provide forms — County clerk to process documents — Exceptions. [Effective January 1, 2024]

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, application for a first certificate of registration, or title, in the name of an owner shall be made on forms prescribed by the Department of Vehicle Regulation consistent with this chapter, which shall be available from any county clerk.

Application forms shall be completed, except as to required signatures, by legibly printing in ink, or typing all required information.

The application, when presented to the county clerk, shall contain all required information and be fully executed with all required supporting documentation and fees.

The county clerk shall reject any application upon which the information provided is not legibly printed or typed, the required information is not supplied, not accompanied by required supporting documents, not properly executed with signatures when required, or when the clerk determines that the application is improper or that the applicant is not entitled to registration or title of the vehicle for which registration or title is sought, or in the absence of the required fees.

This section shall not apply to applications for title using the electronic title application and registration system established under KRS

186A.017

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 22, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 128, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2022 ch. 18, § 5, effective January 1, 2024.

186A.127.
Permanent fleet registration plates — Fees and taxes — Delinquency penalty — Annual reconciliation — Administrative regulations. [Effective January 1, 2024]

The cabinet shall establish procedures whereby an owner or lessee of fleet vehicles may be issued permanent fleet registration plates for vehicles in its fleet.

The owner of a fleet of motor vehicles shall, upon application in the manner and at the time prescribed and upon approval by the department, payment of ad valorem taxes under KRS Chapter 132, and registration fees under KRS

186.040

or

186.050

, be issued permanent fleet license plates. Except for U-Drive-It vehicles described in subsection (3)(b) of this section, vehicles with a fleet license plate shall have the company’s name or logo and unit number displayed on the vehicle so that they are readily identifiable.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, fleet plates, which shall be of a distinctive color, shall have the word “Fleet” appearing at the bottom, and the word “Kentucky” appearing at the top. In all other respects, fleet plates shall conform to the provisions of KRS

186.240

.

U-Drive-It vehicles owned by a motor vehicle renting company as defined by KRS

281.687

shall be issued regular standard issue license plates. Fleet vehicles under this paragraph shall be issued a decal by the cabinet to denote the permanent registration status of the vehicle.

In addition to the registration fee prescribed by KRS

186.050

for initial and renewal registrations, an annual fleet management fee of two dollars ($2) per vehicle shall be charged. A one-time license plate manufacturing fee of four dollars ($4) shall be charged for plates issued for the established number of vehicles in the fleet. All fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the road fund.

Payment of ad valorem taxes and registration fees shall be made annually and shall be evidenced only by the issuance of a single receipt by the cabinet. The provisions of KRS

186.170

requiring a registration receipt to be kept in the vehicle shall not apply and no annual registration decal shall be required for vehicles registered in accordance with this section.

If a recipient of fleet license plates fails to pay all annual registration fees and ad valorem taxes on vehicles in its fleet properly and in a timely manner, the cabinet may impose a delinquency penalty of:

Ten percent (10%) of the delinquent taxes and fees due, if the failure is for not more than thirty (30) days; and

An additional ten percent (10%) penalty for each additional thirty (30) days, or fraction thereof, that the failure continues, not to exceed a total penalty of one hundred percent (100%) in the aggregate.

All recipients of fleet license plates authorized by this section shall provide the department with an annual vehicle reconciliation and shall annually surrender all unassigned license plates. Failure to comply with this subsection may result in fines of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each occurrence or in suspension or termination from the fleet program.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to set forth procedures for:

Fleet vehicle owners to apply to the cabinet for permanent registration for their fleet vehicles in accordance with this section; and

Fleet vehicle owners who qualify as approved entities under KRS

186A.005

to access the electronic title application and registration system for registration renewal and payment of annual fees and taxes on permanent registrations.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 18, § 13, effective January 1, 2024.

186A.130.
Fee for title application.

There shall be paid for issuing and processing documents required by this chapter fees according to the following schedule:

Each application for a certificate of title shall be nine dollars ($9), of which the county clerk shall retain six dollars ($6) and the Transportation Cabinet shall receive three dollars ($3).

Each application for a replacement or corrected certificate of title shall be six dollars ($6), of which the county clerk shall retain four dollars ($4) and the Transportation Cabinet shall receive two dollars ($2). If a corrected certificate must be issued because of an error of the county clerk or the Department of Vehicle Regulation, there shall be no charge.

Each application for a speed title shall be twenty-five dollars ($25), of which the county clerk shall retain five dollars ($5) and the Transportation Cabinet shall receive twenty dollars ($20).

Each application for a certificate of title for an all-terrain vehicle shall be fifteen dollars ($15), of which the county clerk shall retain six dollars ($6) and the Transportation Cabinet shall receive nine dollars ($9).

Each application for a replacement or corrected certificate of title for an all-terrain vehicle shall be ten dollars ($10), of which the county clerk shall retain four dollars ($4) and the Transportation Cabinet shall receive six dollars ($6). If a corrected certificate must be issued because of an error of the county clerk or the Department of Vehicle Regulation, there shall be no charge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 23, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 428, § 34, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 35, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2006, ch. 255, § 11, effective January 1, 2007; 2009, ch. 64, § 3, effective June 25, 2009.

186A.135.
Issuance of documents processed by system. [Repealed.]

186A.140.
Issuance of documents in county not equipped with operable automated system. [Repealed.]

186A.145.
Processing prohibited when property tax account delinquent — Exceptions — Responsibility for ad valorem taxes.

Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a county clerk shall not process an application for Kentucky title and registration from or to any Kentucky resident who has a delinquent motor vehicle ad valorem property tax account.

This section shall not apply to transactions involving:

Licensed Kentucky motor vehicle dealers;

A person who is engaged in the business of storing or towing motor vehicles, applying for a new title under KRS 376.275(1)(c); or

A secured party applying for a repossession title under KRS 186.045(6).

For any vehicle obtained as the result of a claim on a motor vehicle insurance policy, an insurer and its agent shall not be responsible for the payment of any delinquent motor vehicle ad valorem property taxes owed by any previous owner, when:

Applying for a regular or salvage title; or

Transferring ownership of the vehicle to another party.

The owner of a motor vehicle that was transferred to an insurer or its agent under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall remain responsible for any delinquent motor vehicle ad valorem property taxes owed prior to the transfer.

An insurer shall not be exempt from any motor vehicle ad valorem property taxes owed on any vehicle that it owns:

As a part of its business operations; or

On January 1, that was obtained as the result of a claim on a motor vehicle insurance policy.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 26, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 113, § 8, effective December 31, 1988; 1998, ch. 128, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 74, § 14, effective June 29, 2021.

186A.147.
Prohibition against registration of personal motor vehicle owned by delinquent taxpayer — Written tax clearance — Informal hearing — Exception.

A county clerk shall not process an application for, nor issue a:

Kentucky registration or renewal of registration;

Replacement plate, decal, or registration certificate;

Duplicate registration;

Transfer of registration; or

Temporary tag;

for any motor vehicle if AVIS lists the vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle as owned by a delinquent taxpayer as defined in KRS

131.1817

.

The county clerk shall not process the applicable application or issue the applicable document until a written tax clearance has been received by the Department of Vehicle Regulation from the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Department of Revenue, as provided in KRS

131.1817

.

A person who has been adversely affected by the refusal of a county clerk to process an application or issue a document under this section may request an informal hearing, to be conducted by the Transportation Cabinet or its agency designated in writing for that purpose.

The request for the informal hearing shall be writing and shall be filed with the Transportation Cabinet within thirty (30) days after the county clerk’s refusal to process an application or issue a document.

The only matter to be considered at the hearing shall be whether there is a mistake in fact made by the Department of Revenue or the Department of Vehicle Regulation in the determination that the person is a delinquent taxpayer.

This section shall not apply to any transactions involving Kentucky motor vehicle dealers who are licensed under KRS

190.030

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 119, § 5, effective July 1, 2013.

186A.150.
Procedures for receiving application in event of outage of automated system. [Repealed.]

186A.155.
Duties of county clerk after system becomes operational. [Repealed.]

186A.160.
County clerk to distribute copies of certificate of registration. [Repealed.]

186A.165.
County clerk to prepare application transmittal record. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

Not later than 3 p.m. on the next business day after an application for a first certificate of registration or title for a vehicle is received by him, the county clerk shall prepare on forms supplied by the Department of Vehicle Regulation, an application transmittal record.

The clerk shall indicate thereon in the spaces provided, the name of his county, the date or time period the transmittal relates to and, in the order they are to be attached to the transmittal record, a notation for each application attached consisting of the applicant’s last name and initials or if the applicant is other than an individual, the name commonly used by the applicant and any other information required upon the form as indicated thereon.

The clerk shall ensure that the original of all applications noted on the transmittal, together with the original of all required supporting documents are attached to the transmittal record in the order shown thereon, and shall thereafter sign and date the original of the transmittal record as of the date the transmittal is being forwarded to Frankfort.

The county clerk shall place the original of each application record, with the original of each application shown thereon, and its required supporting documents, together with the acknowledgment of the transmittal record, in the envelope or other container provided by the Department of Vehicle Regulation and forward to the Division of Motor Vehicle Licensing in Frankfort.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 30, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.165.
County clerk to complete transmittal record — Exceptions. [Effective January 1, 2024]

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, not later than 3 p.m. on the next business day after an application for a certificate of registration or title and registration for a vehicle is received, the county clerk shall complete a transmittal record.

The clerk shall indicate thereon in the spaces provided, the name of his or her county, the date or time period the transmittal relates to and, in the order they are to be attached to the transmittal record, a notation for each application attached consisting of the applicant’s last name and initials or if the applicant is other than an individual, the name commonly used by the applicant and any other information required upon the form as indicated thereon.

The clerk shall ensure that the original of all applications noted on the transmittal, together with the original of all required supporting documents are attached to the transmittal record in the order shown thereon, and shall thereafter sign and date the original of the transmittal record as of the date the transmittal is being forwarded to Frankfort.

This section shall not apply to applications for title using the electronic title application and registration system established under KRS

186A.017

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 30, effective July 15, 1982; 2022 ch. 18, § 3, effective January 1, 2024.

186A.170.
Duties of Department of Vehicle Regulation in processing title applications.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall:

Within five (5) working days following receipt by it of an application for a certificate of title in proper form, process the application and its supporting documents in the manner provided in this section, and unless it finds discrepancies with respect to it or its supporting documents, issue a certificate of title in the name of the owner and send it postpaid to such owner; and

Within forty-eight (48) hours following electronic notification by a county clerk’s office of an application for a certificate of title, issue a speed title which shall be held for pickup or returned to the owner by mail. The clerk shall take the application for title and process the appropriate paperwork as provided for in this chapter. The department may provide, by administrative regulation, for exceptions to the speed title procedure.

Upon receiving an application packet from a county clerk, the application receipt clerk of the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall:

Cause the date and time of receipt to be stamped on both the department’s copy and the acknowledgment copy of the application transmittal record and accompanying documents;

Cause at least duplicate sets of images to be made of each transmittal record application and supporting document by a means that will provide rapid, selective, automated retrieval of individual document images by appropriate indexing methods or keys; and

Compare the application transmittal record with the documents accompanying it and, if all applications shown upon the record are accompanying the record, endorse the department’s copy of the transmittal record and the acknowledgment copy, and forward the acknowledgment copy to the clerk who issued it.

In the event there is a discrepancy between the application transmittal record and the application attached to it, the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall note the discrepancy upon the department’s copy and the acknowledgment copy, and shall promptly contact the issuing clerk and resolve the discrepancy. After resolving the discrepancy, the department shall note the nature of the disposition of the discrepancy and endorse the respective copies and forward the acknowledgment copy with the discrepancy disposition noted thereon to the issuing clerk.

After executing the acknowledgment of receipt of applications, the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall carry out the following action with respect to each application:

Examine the owner’s application for legibility and proper execution, presence of required information, including required supporting documents, and the presence of required signatures. The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall ensure also that the required supporting documents are consistent in pertinent part with the information shown on the owner’s application;

The documents supporting an owner’s application shall be examined as to authenticity and to determine if fraudulent alteration has occurred;

Ensure that the vehicle identification number of the subject vehicle is apparently legitimate;

Ensure that the vehicle identification number and any other appropriate information with respect to a vehicle for which a certificate of title has been applied for is compared against the National Crime Information Center (NCIC) computerized listings of vehicles reported stolen, unless NCIC is not operational and the department has official notification that it is not expected to be operational within four (4) working days following the day on which an application for a certificate of title is received by it; and

Compare the computer-produced certificate of title for consistency with the owner’s application and supporting documents.

When the title application has been completed, and the application examiner at each significant stage has indicated, by placing his unique symbol upon the application in the space provided thereon, that an application has passed the required examinations, the application shall be examined by a title examination certifier.

The title application certifier shall ensure that each application has received the required examinations as indicated by the presence of each required examiner’s symbol. Upon satisfying himself that an application has passed the required examinations, the title examination certifier shall place his unique symbol together with the date upon the application.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall withhold issuance of a title, until its questions are resolved to its satisfaction, when it finds material discrepancies or has information giving probable cause to believe:

That an applicant is not the lawful owner of a vehicle for which he seeks a title;

His application is not in order;

The documentation supporting an application is insufficient or fraudulent;

The vehicle has an illegitimate vehicle identification number;

The vehicle is stolen; or

That the computer-produced certificate of title is not consistent with the owner’s application.

In the case of multiple owners, the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall require only two (2) primary owners’ names to be printed on the certificate of title. Upon submission of the title application, if more than two (2) owners are listed, the primary owners shall be determined by the title applicants. In such instances, the certificate of the title shall note that there are more than two (2) owners. The names of all title applicants shall be documented in AVIS.

When the Department of Vehicle Regulation finds that a certificate of title should be issued for a vehicle, the endorsement of the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall be engrossed upon the certificate of title following a preprinted statement which shall read: I certify that the Department of Vehicle Regulation has exercised due diligence in examining an application for a certificate of title for the above-described vehicle, and to the best of our knowledge and belief, the applicant whose name appears above is the lawful owner of the apparently legitimate vehicle described herein. ___________________ (signature), commissioner, Department of Vehicle Regulation, Kentucky Transportation Cabinet.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 31, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 35, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 61, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 113, § 2, effective January 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 148, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

186A.175.
Form of certificate of title issued by department. [Repealed.]

186A.180.
Owner may obtain updated certificate of title.

An owner who has obtained a certificate of title pursuant to this chapter may apply for and obtain an updated certificate, but shall not be required to periodically renew a certificate of title that has been issued to him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 33, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Survey of Law, Nowka, Commercial Law, 72 Ky. L.J. 337 (1983-84).

186A.185.
Department to be custodian of documents.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall:

Be the custodian of the original of each application for a certificate of title, and its supporting documents. It shall retain such records in accordance with a records retention and destruction schedule established pursuant to the archives and records statutes of this state.

Furnish on a periodic basis not less than quarterly to other states, either the original, or a copy, or listings of all certificates of title received from them, to include title and document control numbers in addition to the vehicle description and owner information.

Maintain active liaison with other states regarding vehicle titling and its auto-theft implications, and obtain from them on a regular basis, listings of documents reported missing or stolen or counterfeit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 34, effective July 15, 1982.